Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.080

Use of proceeds of criminal profiteering—Controlling enterprise or realty—Conspiracy or attempt.

(1)(a) It is unlawful for a person who has knowingly received any of the proceeds derived, directly or indirectly, from a pattern of criminal profiteering activity to use or invest, whether directly or indirectly, any part of the proceeds, or the proceeds derived from the investment or use thereof, in the acquisition of any title to, or any right, interest, or equity in, real property or in the establishment or operation of any enterprise.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class B felony.

(2)(a) It is unlawful for a person knowingly to acquire or maintain, directly or indirectly, any interest in or control of any enterprise or real property through a pattern of criminal profiteering activity.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class B felony.

(3)(a) It is unlawful for a person knowingly to conspire or attempt to violate subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 89; 2001 c 222 s 11. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 8; 1984 c 270 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.